Utah statutes.
65A-2-6.   Permitted areas at Bear Lake for launching and retrieving watercraft -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  If a person owns property adjacent to state lands surrounding Bear Lake, the division shall issue a permit that allows the person to launch or retrieve a vessel in an area adjacent to the person's property.

(2)  The division shall, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules to administer Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 370, 2013 General Session

